Maryland, session 2025, HB0990.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
4–112.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0990*

HOUSE BILL 990
(A) BEGINNING JUNE 30, 2030, A MUNICIPALITY SHALL COMPLY WITH THIS
SECTION WHEN APPOINTING, HIRING, OR CONTINUING TO EMPLOY AN INDIVIDUAL
AS A COMPTROLLER, A TREASURER, OR ANY OTHER APPOINTEE OR EMPLOYEE OF
THE MUNICIPALITY WHO IS RESPONSIBLE FOR:
(1) FINANCIAL OVERSIGHT OF THE MUNICIPALITY;
(2) MANAGING THE FUNDS OF THE MUNICIPALITY; OR
(3) MAINTAINING AND PREPARING ACCOUNTING, BUDGET, AND
FINANCIAL REPORTS FOR THE MUNICIPALITY.
(B) A MUNICIPAL COMPTROLLER, TREASURER, OR OTHER APPOINTEE OR
EMPLOYEE DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) HAVE SATISFACTORILY COMPLETED 27 SEMESTER HOURS OF
UNDERGRADUATE OR GRADUATE LEVEL ACCOUNTING COURSES THAT INCLUDE AT
LEAST:
(I) THREE SEMESTER HOURS OR THEIR EQUIVALENT OF:
1. ACCOUNTING INFORMATION SYSTEMS;
2. ACCOUNTING ETHICS OR BUSINESS ETHICS; AND
3. AUDITING; AND
(II) NINE SEMESTER HOURS OR THEIR EQUIVALENT OF
FINANCIAL ACCOUNTING;
(2) HOLD A BACCALAUREATE OR HIGHER DEGREE IN ACCOUNTING,
BUSINESS ADMINISTRATION, FINANCE, PUBLIC ADMINISTRATION, OR A RELATED
FIELD FROM AN ACCREDITED INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION; AND
(3) HAVE AT LEAST 5 YEARS OF FULL–TIME EMPLOYMENT
EXPERIENCE IN ACCOUNTING OR FINANCE OR A RELATED FIELD THAT INCLUDES AT
LEAST 3 YEARS IN A SUPERVISORY OR LEADERSHIP ROLE IN ACCOUNTING, FINANCE,
PUBLIC FINANCE, OR A RELATED FIELD.
(C) (1) TO ENSURE THE CONTINUED INTEGRITY AND CAPABILITY OF THE
FINANCIAL ADMINISTRATION OF THE STATE’S MUNICIPALITIES, AS A CONDITION OF
THE CONTINUED EMPLOYMENT OF A MUNICIPAL COMPTROLLER, TREASURER, OR

HOUSE BILL 990 3
OTHER APPOINTEE OR EMPLOYEE DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION, EACH MUNICIPALITY SHALL ESTABLISH CONTINUING EDUCATION
REQUIREMENTS.
(2) THE CONTINUING EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS SHALL ESTABLISH
A MINIMUM NUMBER OF HOURS EACH YEAR OF PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT AND
TRAINING RELATED TO ETHICS IN FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT, GOVERNMENT
ACCOUNTING, OR MUNICIPAL FINANCE.
(D) A MUNICIPALITY SHALL:
(1) MAINTAIN A RECORD OF THE QUALIFICATIONS OF AN INDIVIDUAL
APPOINTED OR EMPLOYED AS A MUNICIPAL COMPTROLLER, TREASURER, OR OTHER
APPOINTEE OR EMPLOYEE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION;
(2) MAKE THE RECORD AVAILABLE FOR PUBLIC INSPECTION; AND
(3) INCLUDE THE RECORD IN THE REPORT TO THE LEGISLATIVE
AUDITOR REQUIRED UNDER § 16–306 OF THIS ARTICLE.
16–307.
(a) (1) Each year the Legislative Auditor shall:
(i) review the audit reports required under § 16–306 of this subtitle;
and
(ii) make a full and detailed written report to the Comptroller and,
in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Executive Director of the
Department of Legislative Services on the result of the audit of the financial records of each
county, municipality, and special taxing district created by the State.
(2) THE REPORT SHALL INCLUDE INFORMATION ON THE
COMPLIANCE OF EACH MUNICIPALITY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 4–112 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(3) The report may include recommendations that the Legislative Auditor
considers advisable relating to:
(i) methods of bookkeeping;
(ii) changes in the uniform system of financial reporting; and
(iii) changes in the reports of the counties, municipalities, and special
taxing districts.

HOUSE BILL 990
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to any
individual appointed or hired by a municipality on or after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.